Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 5. Boilers and Pressure Vessels

§ 2881.
General provisions.

A person shall not install or maintain a boiler or pressure vessel that is unsafe or likely to be unsafe to other persons or property.

A person shall not operate, cause to be operated, or permit to be operated any boiler or pressure vessel under his or her control or ownership in a manner that causes or is likely to cause harm to other persons or property.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 4a, eff. April 1, 2005.

§ 2882.
Rules; installation standards.

The Commissioner may adopt rules pertaining to boilers and pressure vessels, and standards to be observed, necessary for the safety and protection of the public, employees, and property. The Commissioner may provide for operating certificates to be issued before a boiler or pressure vessel may be used.

A boiler or pressure vessel regulated by the rules adopted under this section shall be designed, manufactured, and assembled in accordance with the relevant standards published by the:

American Society of Mechanical Engineers;

Canadian Standards Association;

European Committee for Standardization, for boilers with a maximum water jacket size of 60 gallons, a maximum input of 250,000 Btu, and a maximum relief valve setting of 30 pounds per square inch gauge; or

European Committee for Standardization, for boilers or pressure vessels with an input of greater than 250,000 Btu or a water jacket size of greater than 60 gallons as approved by the Commissioner.

A boiler or pressure vessel regulated by the rules adopted under this section shall be installed in accordance with the National Board Inspection Code, as amended, including control, safety, and pressure relief devices in accordance with the relevant standards published by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers.

A boiler or pressure vessel regulated by the rules adopted under this section shall provide the manufacturer’s design information, instructions, data plates, and warning labels in English.

In reviewing an application for a variance, the Commissioner may rely upon decisions or information from other states or governmental entities that have reviewed and approved a boiler or pressure vessel that does not meet one of the standards set forth under subsection (b) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 4a, eff. April 1, 2005; amended

2009, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2883.
Boiler inspections.

The Commissioner has authority to obtain specific information from boiler inspectors on forms that shall first be approved by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner may authorize qualified inspectors to conduct inspections under such rules as the Commissioner may prescribe.

If a boiler or pressure vessel is insured, the inspection may be conducted by a qualified inspector who is employed, or contractually authorized, by the insurer.

If a boiler or pressure vessel is not insured, the inspection may be conducted by any qualified inspector authorized by the Commissioner. In case the inspection is made by such an inspector, a fee shall not be charged by the Division, except a process fee of $30.00 for issuance of an operating certificate.

The fee for a person requesting a three-year authorization to conduct inspections shall be $150.00.
(c) (1) The fee for a person requesting a three-year authorization to conduct inspections shall be $150.00.

A licensed boiler inspector shall carry liability insurance in an amount determined by the Department.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 4a, eff. April 1, 2005; amended

2009, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 35, eff. July 1, 2021.

§ 2884.
Qualifications of inspectors.

Examination. All boiler inspectors shall have passed the examination required by the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors, and hold annual certification from that Board.

Education. The Commissioner shall require each boiler inspector to complete an education module regarding the State’s energy goals and how the boiler inspection profession can further those goals.

The education module shall be not more than two hours and shall be required as a condition of initial authorization and authorization renewal. The module shall include education on any State or utility incentives relevant to the profession.

The education module for initial authorization shall provide general information regarding the State’s energy goals.

The education module for authorization renewal shall provide any updates on the State’s energy goals and any updates regarding corresponding State energy programs applicable to the profession.

The Commissioner shall consider any recommendations on these education modules provided by relevant stakeholders and approve education modules in consultation with the Agency of Natural Resources and the Department of Public Service.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 4a, eff. April 1, 2005; amended

2009, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 35, eff. July 1, 2021.

§ 2885.
Penalties.

The Commissioner may assess penalties pursuant to section 2734 of this title against a person who violates this subchapter or any rule adopted under this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 4a, eff. April 1, 2005.